Utah statutes.
59-7-803.   Filing returns -- Extension.

(1)  An organization subject to the tax imposed by this part shall file a state return on or before the date which the exempt organization is required to file its federal exempt organization business income tax return, including extensions.

(2)  If a valid federal extension is filed, the extension shall be considered valid for state purposes and payment of tax shall be made as provided in Section 59-7-507.

